Arkansas, session 2025, SB385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-6-106(c), concerning the functions,
powers, and duties of the Rural Services Division of the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission, is repealed.
(c) The division shall prepare and submit biennially on January 1 a
comprehensive report concerning the assistance activities undertaken by the
division, any recommendations for legislative proposals, data concerning
program activities in rural areas, and other pertinent information which will
indicate the activities conducted by the division in the previous biennium.




*JLL262*
03/05/2025 9:59:55 AM JLL262